Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.285

Special election—Determination—Order—Certification.

(1) If a special election is held to vote on a proposal or alternate proposals to form a new school district, the votes cast by the registered voters in each component district shall be tabulated separately. Any such proposition shall be considered approved only if it receives a majority of the votes cast in each separate district voting thereon.

(2) If a special election is held to vote on a proposal for adjustment of bonded indebtedness, the entire vote cast by the registered voters of the proposed new district or of the established district as the case may be shall be tabulated. Any such proposition shall be considered approved if three-fifths or more of all votes cast thereon are in the affirmative and forty percent of the voters who voted at the last preceding general election cast a ballot.

(3) In the event of approval of a proposition or propositions voted on at a special election, the educational service district superintendent shall:

(a) Make an order establishing such new school district or such terms of adjustment of bonded indebtedness or both, as were approved by the registered voters and shall also order such other terms of adjustment, if there are any, of property and other assets and of liabilities other than bonded indebtedness as have been approved by the state council; and

(b) Certify his or her action to the county and school district officials specified in RCW 28A.315.215. The educational service district superintendent may designate, with the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, a name and number different from that of any component thereof, but must designate the new district by name and number different from any other district in existence in the county.

(4) The educational service district superintendent shall fix as the effective date of any order or orders he or she is required to make by this chapter, the date specified in the order of final approval of any change in the organization and extent of school districts or of any terms of adjustment of the assets and liabilities of school districts subject, for taxing purposes, to the redrawing of taxing district boundaries under RCW 84.09.030, by the regional committee.

(5) Upon receipt of certification under this section, the superintendent of each school district that is included in the new district shall deliver to the superintendent of the new school district those books, papers, documents, records, and other materials pertaining to the territory transferred.

[ 2012 c 186 s 12; 1999 c 315 s 705.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.